Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 2 Procedure for Appointment

29-4-10.
Petition for appointment of guardian; requirements for petition.

Any interested person, including the proposed ward, may file a petition for the appointment of a guardian. Such petition shall be filed in the court of the county in which:

The proposed ward is domiciled;

The proposed ward is found; provided, however, that if the court of the county where the proposed ward is found determines that the proposed ward was removed to such county solely for the purposes of filing a petition for the appointment of a guardian and that such court acquired jurisdiction to appoint a guardian because of unjustifiable conduct, such court may take any action authorized by Code Section 29-11-16; or

Jurisdiction is otherwise proper under Code Section 29-11-12.

The petition for appointment of a guardian shall set forth:

A statement of the facts upon which the court’s jurisdiction is based;

The name, address, and county of domicile of the proposed ward, if known;

The name, address, and county of domicile of the petitioner or petitioners and the petitioner’s relationship to the proposed ward, if any, and, if different from the petitioner, the name, address, and county of domicile of the person nominated by the petitioner to serve as guardian and that person’s relationship to the proposed ward, if any;

A statement of the reasons the guardianship is sought, including the facts which support the claim of the need for a guardian;

Any foreseeable limitations on the guardianship;

Whether, to the petitioner’s knowledge, there exists any living will, durable power of attorney for health care, advance directive for health care, psychiatric advance directive, order relating to cardiopulmonary resuscitation, or other instrument that deals with the management of the person of the proposed ward in the event of incapacity and the name and address of any fiduciary or agent named in the instrument;

The names and addresses of the following whose whereabouts are known:

The spouse of the proposed ward; and

All children of the proposed ward; or

If there are no adult children, then at least two adults in the following order of priority:

Lineal descendants of the proposed ward;

Parents and siblings of the proposed ward; and

Friends of the proposed ward;

If known, the name and address of any individual nominated to serve as guardian by the proposed ward, as described in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-3;

If known, the name and address of any individual nominated to serve as guardian by the proposed ward’s spouse, adult child, or parent, as described in paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-3;

Whether any nominated guardian has consented or will consent to serve as guardian;

If known, whether any nominated guardian is an owner, operator, or employee of a long-term care or other caregiving institution or facility at which the proposed ward is receiving care, and, if so, whether the nominated guardian is related to the proposed ward by blood, marriage, or adoption;

Whether an emergency guardian has been appointed for the proposed ward or a petition for the appointment of an emergency guardian has been filed or is being filed;

If known, a disclosure of any ownership or other financial interest that would cause any nominated guardian to have a conflict of interest with the proposed ward;

A specific listing of any of the additional powers, as described in subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-23, that are requested by the guardian and a statement of the circumstances that would justify the granting of additional powers;

Whether a guardian or conservator has been appointed in another state or whether a petition for the appointment of a guardian or conservator is pending in another state;

That to petitioner’s knowledge, there has been no petition for guardianship denied or dismissed within two years by any court of this state or, if so, that there has been a significant change in the condition or circumstances of the individual, as shown by the accompanying affidavits or evaluation;

Any state in which the proposed ward was physically present, including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months immediately before the filing of the petition or ending within the six months prior to the filing of the petition; and

The reason for any omission in the petition for appointment of a guardian in the event full particulars are lacking.

The petition shall be sworn to by two or more petitioners or shall be supported by an affidavit of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker, or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal medical facility in which such a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker who is authorized to practice in that facility.

Any affidavit shall be based on personal knowledge and shall state that the affiant has examined the proposed ward within 15 days prior to the filing of the petition and that, based on the examination, the proposed ward was determined to lack sufficient capacity to make or communicate significant, responsible decisions concerning the proposed ward’s health or safety.

In addition to stating the facts that support the claim of the need for a guardian, the affidavit shall state the foreseeable duration of the guardianship and may set forth the affiant’s opinion as to any other limitations on the guardianship.

Within six months prior to the date a minor in the custody of the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services reaches 18 years of age, the Division of Family and Children Services may file a petition for the appointment of a guardian for the minor when that minor becomes an adult, in accordance with the provisions of this article, to take effect on or after the date the minor reaches 18 years of age.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 8/HB 24; Ga. L. 2013, p. 884, § 1/HB 446; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 6/HB 70; Ga. L. 2021, p. 151, § 14/HB 154; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-6/HB 752.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “Any interested person or persons, including the proposed ward, may file a petition for the appointment of a guardian. The petition shall be filed in the court of the county in which the proposed ward is domiciled or is found, provided that the court of the county where the proposed ward is found shall not have jurisdiction to hear any guardianship petition if it appears that the proposed ward was removed to that county solely for the purposes of filing a petition for the appointment of a guardian.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added subsection (d).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “psychiatric advance directive,” in the middle of paragraph (b)(6).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn.
In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2017).

29-4-11.
Prerequisite judicial finding of probable cause; notice; petition; evaluations; reporting requirements.

Upon the filing of a petition for guardianship of a proposed ward, the court shall review the petition and the affidavit, if any, and determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of a guardian within the meaning of Code Section 29-4-1.

If the court determines that there is no probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of a guardian, the court shall dismiss the petition and provide the proposed ward with a copy of the petition, the affidavit, if any, and the order dismissing the petition.

If the court determines that there is probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of a guardian:

The court shall immediately notify the proposed ward of the proceedings by service of all pleadings on the proposed ward, which notice shall:

Be served personally on the proposed ward by an officer of the court and shall not be served by mail;

Inform the proposed ward that a petition has been filed to have a guardian appointed for the proposed ward, that the proposed ward has the right to attend any hearing that is held, and that, if a guardian is appointed, the proposed ward may lose important rights to control the management of the proposed ward’s person;

Inform the proposed ward of the place and time at which the proposed ward shall submit to the evaluation provided for by subsection (d) of this Code section; and

Inform the proposed ward of the proposed ward’s right to independent legal counsel and that the court shall appoint counsel within two days of service unless the proposed ward indicates that he or she has retained counsel in that time frame;

Upon notice that the proposed ward has retained legal counsel or upon the appointment of legal counsel by the court, the court shall furnish legal counsel with a copy of the petition, the affidavit, if any, and the order for evaluation provided for by subsection (d) of this Code section;

The court shall give notice of the petition by first-class mail to all adult individuals and other persons who are named in the petition pursuant to the requirements of paragraphs (7), (8), and (9) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-10; and

On the motion of any interested person or on the court’s own motion, the court shall determine whether to appoint a guardian ad litem.

If the petition is not dismissed under subsection (b) of this Code section, the court shall appoint an evaluating physician who shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or licensed clinical social worker or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal medical facility in which such a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker authorized to practice in that federal facility, other than the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker who completed the affidavit attached to the petition pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 29-4-10.

When evaluating the proposed ward, the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker shall explain the purpose of the evaluation to the proposed ward. The proposed ward may remain silent. Any statements made by the proposed ward during the evaluation shall be privileged and shall be inadmissable as evidence in any proceeding other than a proceeding under this chapter. The proposed ward’s legal counsel shall have the right to be present but shall not participate in the evaluation.

The evaluation shall be conducted with as little interference with the proposed ward’s activities as possible. The evaluation shall take place at the place and time set in the notice to the proposed ward and the legal counsel and the time set shall not be sooner than the fifth day after the service of notice on the proposed ward. The court, however, shall have the exclusive power to change the place and time of the examination at any time upon reasonable notice being given to the proposed ward and to his or her legal counsel. If the proposed ward fails to appear, the court may order that the proposed ward be taken directly to and from a medical facility or the office of the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker for purposes of evaluation only. The evaluation shall be conducted during the normal business hours of the facility or office and the proposed ward shall not be detained in the facility or office overnight. The evaluation may include, but not be limited to:

A self-report from the proposed ward, if possible;

Questions and observations of the proposed ward to assess the functional abilities of the proposed ward;

A review of the records for the proposed ward including, but not limited to, medical records, medication charts, and other available records;

An assessment of cultural factors and language barriers that may impact the proposed ward’s abilities and living environment; and

All other factors the evaluator determines to be appropriate to the evaluation.

A written report shall be filed with the court no later than seven days after the evaluation and the court shall serve a copy of the report by first-class mail upon the proposed ward and the proposed ward’s legal counsel and, if any, the guardian ad litem.

The report shall be signed under oath by the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker and shall:

State the circumstances and duration of the evaluation, including a summary of questions or tests utilized, and the elements of the evaluation;

List all persons and other sources of information consulted in evaluating the proposed ward;

Describe the proposed ward’s mental and physical state and condition, including all observed facts considered by the physician or psychologist or licensed clinical social worker;

Describe the overall social condition of the proposed ward, including support, care, education, and well-being; and

Describe the needs of the proposed ward and their foreseeable duration.

The proposed ward’s legal counsel may file a written response to the evaluation, provided the response is filed no later than the date of the commencement of the hearing. The response may include, but is not limited to, independent evaluations, affidavits of individuals with personal knowledge of the proposed ward, and a statement of applicable law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2017).

29-4-12.
Judicial review of pleadings and evaluation report; findings; hearing.

After the filing of the evaluation report, the court shall review the pleadings and the evaluation report.

If, after the review, the court finds that there is no probable cause to support a finding that the proposed ward is in need of a guardian within the meaning of Code Section 29-4-1, the court shall dismiss the petition.

If, after the review, the court finds that there is probable cause to support a finding that the proposed ward is in need of a guardian, the court shall schedule a hearing on the petition. Notice of the hearing shall be served by first-class mail upon the proposed ward, the proposed ward’s legal counsel, and the proposed ward’s guardian ad litem, if any; the petitioner or the petitioner’s legal counsel, if any; and all adult individuals and other persons who are named in the petition pursuant to the requirements of paragraphs (7), (8), and (9) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-10. The date of the hearing shall not be less than ten days after the notice is mailed.

The hearing shall be held in a courtroom or, for good cause shown, at such other place as the court may choose. At the request of the proposed ward or the proposed ward’s legal counsel and for good cause shown, the court may exercise its discretion to exclude the public from the hearing and the record shall reflect the court’s action. The proposed ward or the proposed ward’s legal counsel may waive the appearance of the proposed ward at the hearing.

The hearing shall be recorded by either a certified court reporter or a sound-recording device. The recording shall be retained for not less than 45 days from the date of the entry of the order described in Code Section 29-4-13.

The court shall apply the rules of evidence applicable in civil cases.

The court shall utilize the criteria in Code Section 29-4-1 to determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence of the need for a guardianship in light of the evidence taken at the hearing. In addition, the court may consider the evaluation report and any response filed by the proposed ward. The burden of proof shall be upon the petitioner.

Upon determination of the need for a guardianship, the court shall determine the powers, if any, which are to be retained by the proposed ward, in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-4-21 and whether any additional powers are to be granted to the guardian, pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-23.

If the court determines that a guardianship is necessary and the proposed ward is present, the proposed ward may suggest any individual as guardian. The court shall select as guardian the individual who will serve the best interest of the ward.

In any procedure under this chapter in which the judge of the court is unable to hear a case within the time required for such hearing, the judge shall appoint an individual to hear the case and exercise all the jurisdiction of the court in the case. Any individual appointed shall be a member of the State Bar of Georgia who is qualified to serve as the probate judge in that county and who is, in the opinion of the appointing judge, qualified for the duties by training and experience. The appointment may be made on a case-by-case basis or by making a standing appointment of one or more individuals. Any individual who receives a standing appointment shall serve at the pleasure of the judge who makes the appointment or the judge’s successor in office. The compensation of an individual appointed shall be as agreed upon by the judge who makes the appointment and the individual appointed, with the approval of the governing authority of the county for which the individual is appointed, and shall be paid from county funds. All fees collected for the service of the appointed individual shall be paid into the general funds of the county.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2017).

29-4-13.
Requirements of order granting guardianship; service.

The court shall issue an order that sets forth the findings of fact and conclusions of law that support the grant or denial of the petition. An order granting guardianship shall specify:

The name of the guardian and the basis for the selection;

Any powers retained by the ward pursuant to Code Section 29-4-21;

The limitations on the guardianship;

A specific listing of any of the additional powers, as described in subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-23, that are granted to the guardian;

If only a guardian is appointed or if the guardian and the conservator appointed are not the same person, the reasonable sums of property to be provided the guardian to provide adequately for the ward’s support, care, education, health, and welfare, subject to modification by subsequent order of the court;

The type and frequency of any physical, mental, and social evaluations of the ward’s condition which the court may require to supplement the reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (9) of subsection (a) of Code Section 29-4-22; and

Such other and further provisions of the guardianship as the court shall determine to be in the best interest of the ward, stating the reasons therefor.

Service of the court’s order shall be made by first-class mail upon the ward, the ward’s legal counsel, the guardian ad litem, if any, the guardian, the petitioner, and other persons designated for service of the petition for guardianship.

After service of an order granting guardianship, the ward’s legal counsel shall make reasonable efforts to explain to the ward the order and the ward’s rights under the order.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 273 (2015).

29-4-14.
Petition for appointment of emergency guardian; requirements of petition.

Any interested person, including the proposed ward, may file a petition for the appointment of an emergency guardian. Such petition shall be filed in the court of the county in which:

The proposed ward is domiciled;

The proposed ward is found; or

Jurisdiction is otherwise proper under Code Section 29-11-12.

The petition for appointment of an emergency guardian shall set forth:

A statement of the facts upon which the court’s jurisdiction is based;

The name, address, and county of domicile of the proposed ward, if known;

The name, address, and county of domicile of the petitioner and the petitioner’s relationship to the proposed ward;

A statement of the reasons the emergency guardianship is sought, including the facts that support the need for a guardian and the facts that establish an immediate and substantial risk of death or serious physical injury, illness, or disease unless an emergency guardian is appointed;

The reasons why compliance with the procedures of Code Sections 29-4-10 through 29-4-13 is not appropriate in the circumstances;

The fact that no other person appears to have authority and willingness to act in the circumstances, whether under a power of attorney, trust, or otherwise; and

The reason for any omission in the petition for appointment of emergency guardian in the event full particulars are lacking.

The petition shall state whether a petition for the appointment of a guardian or conservator has been filed or is being filed in conjunction with the petition for the appointment of an emergency guardian.

The petition shall be sworn to by two or more petitioners or shall be supported by an affidavit of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal medical facility in which such a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker authorized to practice in that facility.

Any affidavit shall be based on personal knowledge and shall state that the affiant has examined the proposed ward within 15 days prior to the filing of the petition and that, based on the examination, the proposed ward was determined to lack sufficient capacity to make or communicate significant, responsible decisions concerning the proposed ward’s health or safety and that there is an immediate and substantial risk of death or serious physical injury, illness, or disease unless an emergency guardian is appointed.

In addition to stating the facts that support the claim of the need for an emergency guardianship, the affidavit shall state the foreseeable duration of the emergency guardianship and may set forth the affiant’s opinion as to any other limitations on the emergency guardianship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 7/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “Any interested person, including the proposed ward, may file a petition for the appointment of an emergency guardian. The petition shall be filed in the court of the county in which the proposed ward is domiciled or is found.”

29-4-15.
Prerequisite findings prior to appointment of emergency guardian; evaluation; notice; hearing.

Upon the filing of a petition for an emergency guardianship, the court shall review the petition and the affidavit, if any, to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of an emergency guardian within the meaning of paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-14.

If the court determines that there is no probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of an emergency guardian, the court shall dismiss the petition and provide the proposed ward with a copy of the petition, the affidavit, if any, and the order dismissing the petition.

If the court determines that there is probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of an emergency guardian, the court shall:

Immediately appoint legal counsel to represent the proposed ward at the emergency hearing, which counsel may be the same counsel who is appointed to represent the proposed ward in the hearing on the petition for guardianship or conservatorship, if any such petition has been filed, and shall inform counsel of the appointment;

Order an emergency hearing to be conducted not sooner than three days nor later than five days after the filing of the petition;

Order an evaluation of the proposed ward by a physician who shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker, other than the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker who completed the affidavit attached to the petition pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-10. The evaluation shall be conducted within 72 hours of the time the order was issued and a written report shall be furnished to the court and made available to the parties within this time frame, which evaluation and report shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-11;

Immediately notify the proposed ward of the proceedings by service of all pleadings on the proposed ward, which notice shall:

Be served personally on the proposed ward by an officer of the court and shall not be served by mail;

Inform the proposed ward that a petition has been filed to have an emergency guardian appointed for the proposed ward, that the proposed ward has the right to attend any hearing that is held, and that, if an emergency guardian is appointed, the proposed ward may lose important rights to control the management of the proposed ward’s person;

Inform the proposed ward of the place and time at which the proposed ward shall submit to the evaluation provided for by paragraph (3) of this subsection;

Inform the proposed ward of the appointment of legal counsel; and

Inform the proposed ward of the date and time of the hearing on the emergency guardianship; and

Appoint an emergency guardian to serve until the emergency hearing, with or without prior notice to the proposed ward, if the threatened risk is so immediate and the potential harm so irreparable that any delay is unreasonable and the existence of the threatened risk and potential for irreparable harm is certified by the affidavit of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker. Appointment of an emergency guardian under this paragraph is not a final determination of the proposed ward’s need for a nonemergency guardian. Any emergency guardian appointed under this paragraph shall have only those powers and duties specifically enumerated in the letters of emergency guardianship and the powers and duties shall not exceed those absolutely necessary to respond to the immediate threatened risk to the ward.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 10/SB 534.

29-4-16.
Conduct of emergency guardianship hearing; limitations on emergency guardianship.

The court shall conduct the emergency guardianship hearing, at the time and date set forth in its order, to determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence of the need for an emergency guardianship in light of the evidence taken at the hearing. In addition to the evidence at the hearing, the court may consider the evaluation report and any response filed by the proposed ward. The burden of proof shall be upon the petitioner. Upon the consent of the petitioner and the proposed ward, the court may grant a continuance of the case for a period not to exceed 30 days.

If the court at the emergency hearing finds that an emergency guardianship is necessary, the court shall order the emergency guardianship; provided, however, that:

Any emergency guardian shall have only those powers and duties specifically enumerated in the letters of emergency guardianship and the powers and duties shall not exceed those absolutely necessary to respond to the immediate threatened risk to the ward;

The court may order the emergency guardian to make any report the court requires; and

The emergency guardianship shall terminate on the earliest of:

The court’s removal of the emergency guardian, with or without cause;

The effective date of the appointment of a guardian;

Unless otherwise specified in the order of dismissal, the dismissal of a petition for appointment of a guardian;

The date specified for the termination in the order appointing the emergency guardian;

Sixty days from the date of appointment of the emergency guardian, provided that the court had jurisdiction to issue such order under paragraph (1) of Code Section 29-11-12; or

Ninety days from the date of appointment of the emergency guardian, provided that the court had jurisdiction to issue such order under paragraph (2) or (3) of Code Section 29-11-12.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 8/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, deleted “or” at the end of subparagraph (b)(3)(D); added the proviso at the end of subparagraph (b)(3)(E); and added subparagraph (b)(3)(F).

29-4-17.
[Repealed] Responsibility for paying expenses of any hearing.

History.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 11/SB 534; repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 9/HB 70, effective January 1, 2020.